Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 8 Sale of Alcoholic Beverages at Publicly Owned Facilities

3-8-1.
Regulation and taxation of sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages at airports owned or operated by counties or municipalities.

The issuance of licenses for the package sale, sale by the drink, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages within the boundaries of any airport owned or operated, or both, by a county or municipality may be approved by a proper resolution or ordinance of the county or municipal governing authority owning or operating the airport. A license for such sales, storage, and distribution of distilled spirits may be issued only by the governing authority of a municipality or county in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful.

This Code section shall apply regardless of the location of the airport.

For the purposes of regulating the sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages, but not for the purposes of taxation, the airport boundaries of an airport owned or operated, or both, by a county or municipality shall be treated:

If the airport is owned or operated, or both, by a county, as though the airport boundaries were located entirely within the boundaries of the county which owns or operates, or owns and operates, the airport; or

If the airport is owned or operated, or both, by a municipality, as though the airport boundaries were located entirely within the corporate limits of that municipality and entirely within the boundaries of the county in which the greater portion of the municipality owning or operating, or owning and operating, the airport lies.

No county or municipality may control, license, regulate, or exercise police powers over the sale, storage, or distribution of alcoholic beverages within the boundaries of an airport owned or operated, or both, by another municipality or county which has lawfully approved the sale in any fashion or storage of any alcoholic beverages within all or part of the municipality or county.

The county or municipality authorized by law to impose and collect taxes on the sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages at the airport may impose and collect such taxes, unaffected by this Code section; and the county or municipality owning or operating, or both, the airport shall not impose or collect such taxes. The proceeds of the taxes which the county and the municipality are authorized by law to impose and collect on the sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages at the airport shall be equally divided between the county and the municipality.

The county or municipality which issues the license pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section may impose, collect, and receive licensing fees generally paid in connection with the licensing of the sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages; and any county or municipality that would, apart from this Code section, otherwise license or regulate, or both, the sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages at the airport shall not impose or receive any such licensing fees unless it is the county or municipality issuing the license.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1441, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1443, § 1; Code 1933, § 58-828, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 501, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-6501, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 759, § 1.

Cross references.

Construction and regulation of airports generally, T. 6, C. 3.

3-8-2.
Sale of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits at public golf courses operated by counties or municipalities.

The Department of Natural Resources or any county or municipality operating a public golf course and offering food or drink for retail sale as an incident to the operation of the golf course may sell at retail malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits by the drink as an incident to the operation of the golf course upon obtaining a retail consumption license.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 587, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-6502, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 558, § 0.5/SB 121.

3-8-3.
Sale of alcoholic beverages at coliseums.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Coliseum” means any multiuse coliseum-type facility which has a seating capacity of 9,000 or more and which is a project of a coliseum authority, together with related buildings, facilities, and extensions of the project.

“Coliseum authority” means any public coliseum authority created by law in any county having a population of more than 140,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census.

Any coliseum authority operating a coliseum may sell or authorize others to sell, upon obtaining a license from the department, alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises only upon property owned or controlled by the authority, including but not limited to the coliseum. The authority shall determine by resolution, as it may amend from time to time, the conditions, including hours and days of sale, under which such sales shall be permitted.

For the purposes of regulating and taxing the sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages as provided in this Code section, a coliseum shall be considered to be within a municipality if the coliseum, or the greater part of the coliseum, is within the limits of the municipality. A coliseum shall be considered to be within an unincorporated area of a county if the coliseum, or the greater part of the coliseum, is located within an unincorporated area of the county.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-6503, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1463, §§ 5, 12; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2929, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 325, § 1.

3-8-4.
Sale of alcohol by continuing education centers.

As used in this Code section, the term “continuing education center” means any facility offering adult education which is operated by a unit of the University System of Georgia and which has housing facilities capable of accommodating 200 people and banquet facilities capable of serving 400 people.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-21, a continuing education center may sell alcoholic beverages as an incident to its operation. Such sales may be made during all hours during which sales are lawful in the state.

For purposes of regulating and taxing the sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages as provided in this Code section, a continuing education center shall be considered to be within a municipality if the center, or a greater part of the center, is within the limits of the municipality. A continuing education center shall be considered to be within the unincorporated area of a county if the center, or a greater part of the center, is located within the unincorporated area of the county.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-8-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 977, § 1.

3-8-5.
[Reserved] Sale of alcoholic beverages at coliseums during professional sports events.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-8-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 977, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 3; repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 977, § 1, effective January 1, 2000.

Editor’s notes.

Code 1981, §

3-8-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 977, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 3.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 3/HB 79, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013.

3-8-6.
Technical institutes; service of alcoholic beverages; regulation and tax.

As used in this Code section, the term “technical institute” means any facility which is operated by a unit of the Technical College System of Georgia and which has a business conference center capable of accommodating 200 people or more incident to its operation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Sections 3-3-21 and 3-3-21.1, a technical institute may serve alcoholic beverages incident to its operation of a business conference center.

For purposes of regulating and taxing the sale, storage, and distribution of alcoholic beverages as provided in this Code section, a technical institute shall be considered to be within a municipality if the institute, or a greater part of the institute, is within the limits of the municipality. A technical institute shall be considered to be within the unincorporated area of a county if the institute, or a greater part of the institute, is located within the unincorporated area of the county.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-8-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1225, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 335, § 3/SB 435.